District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.05

Advertisement for purchases and contracts required; exceptions.

Repealed.

R.S. § 3709
Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 809, ch. 744, § 9(a)
June 30, 1949, 63 Stat. 403, ch. 288, title VI, § 602(f)
Sept. 5, 1950, 64 Stat. 583, ch. 849,§§ 6(a), (b), 8(c)
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 967, Pub. L. 93-356, § 1
Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 11(c), 23 DCR 9532b
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 405, 44 DCR 1423

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1110.

Prior Codifications